California, session 20252026, AB1266.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The regulatory processes that allow parties affected by regulations the opportunity to bring forward concerns about the economic effects and impacts of future regulations as soon as possible yield better, more complete, and fully informed rules.(2) Providing additional public input, evaluation, and informed responses to major regulations that will result in significant economic impacts to the adopting agency will improve the decisions made by those adopting agencies.(3) The public and the adopting agencies alike are better able to make informed decisions regarding the costs and benefits of proposed regulations when the processes used to evaluate those costs and benefits are standardized in advance and subject to independent scrutiny.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to ensure that the requirements that are applied to state agencies’ evaluations of potential major regulations that will have an economic impact on California’s businesses of greater than $50,000,000, including the creation of a more iterative administrative process that allows the parties affected by the regulations the opportunity to bring forward concerns about the economic effects as early in the rulemaking process as possible, also apply to large air quality management districts that regulate air quality in the geographic areas with the state’s largest employment bases.SEC. 2. Section 40007 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:40007. (a) For purposes of this section, “major regulation” means a proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a standard, rule, or regulation that will have an economic impact on California business enterprises and individuals in an amount exceeding fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), as estimated by a district, as applicable.(b) In addition to other applicable requirements and subject to subdivision (c), in adopting, amending, or repealing a major regulation, a district shall comply with Section 11346.3 of the Government Code.(c) This section only applies to districts with jurisdiction over a geographic area with a population of over five million people or one-eighth of the population of the state, whichever is greater. (d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 11346.3 of the Government Code, subdivision (b) does not require either of the following:(A) The submission of the district’s standardized regulatory impact analysis to Department of Finance for review. A district may submit the standardized regulatory impact analysis to the Department of Finance for review.(B) The review of the district’s standardized regulatory impact analysis by the Department of Finance.(2) Upon the completion of the standardized regulatory impact analysis, a district shall make a finding of compliance with this section when adopting, amending, or repealing a major regulation under either of the following circumstances:(A) The district opts to not submit the standardized regulatory impact analysis to the Department of Finance for review.(B) The Department of Finance does not provide a review of the standardized regulatory impact analysis within 30 days of submission.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII   B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 11342.548 of the Government Code is amended to read:11342.548.“Major regulation” means a proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) that will have an economic impact on California business enterprises and individuals in an amount exceeding fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), as estimated by the agency.